Arkansas, session 2025, HB1275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 99, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 19 — Prohibition on Prior Authorizations for Treatment of Mental
Health Crisis

23-99-1901. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Crisis stabilization unit" means the same as defined in §
20-47-803;
(2)(A) "Health benefit plan" means any individual, blanket, or
group plan, policy, or contract for healthcare services issued or delivered
by a healthcare insurer in this state.
(B) "Health benefit plan" includes a nonfederal self-
funded governmental plan.
(C) "Health benefit plan" does not include a plan that
*ANS155*
02-26-2025 09:51:40 ANS155

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 HB1275
includes only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits;
(3)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an entity that:
(i) Is subject to state insurance regulation,
including without limitation an insurance company, a health maintenance
organization, a hospital and medical service corporation, a risk-based
provider organization, and a sponsor of a nonfederal self-funded governmental
plan; or
(ii) Has subscribers in this state.
(B) “Healthcare insurer” does not include:
(i) A workers' compensation plan; or
(ii) An entity that provides only dental benefits or
eye and vision care benefits;
(4) "Healthcare provider" means:
(A) A doctor of medicine, a doctor of osteopathy, or
another licensed healthcare professional acting within the healthcare
professional's licensed scope of practice; or
(B) A healthcare facility licensed in the state where the
facility is located to provide healthcare services;
(5) "Healthcare service" means a healthcare procedure,
treatment, or service provided:
(A) At a crisis stabilization unit or any other program designed
to provide immediate crisis services; or
(B) By a healthcare provider in an emergency department;
and
(6) "Mental health crisis" means a situation in which an individual's
emotional or mental state becomes so severe that it puts the individual at
risk of harming himself, herself, or others, prevents the individual from
properly caring for himself, herself, or significantly disrupts the
individual's ability to function in daily life.

23-99-1902. Mental health crisis — Prior authorization or
precertification for healthcare service prohibited.
A health benefit plan shall not require prior authorization or
precertification for a healthcare service provided by a healthcare provider
to an individual who is suffering a mental health crisis.

02-26-2025 09:51:40 ANS155

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 HB1275
23-99-1903. Rules.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the
Insurance Commissioner may promulgate rules to implement this subchapter.
(b) The State Board of Finance may promulgate rules to implement this
subchapter that may apply to the State and Public School Life and Health
Insurance Program.

/s/Cavenaugh




























02-26-2025 09:51:40 ANS155